New York, session 2025-2026, S1359.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Dignity 2 for Immigrants in New York State Act". 3 § 2. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 844 to read 4 as follows: 5 § 844. Detainment for violation of federal immigration laws. A law 6 enforcement agency of the state or a political subdivision of the state 7 shall not detain persons otherwise eligible for release from custody 8 whose only violation of law is that they are persons of foreign citizen- 9 ship who have entered or are residing in the United States in violation 10 of federal immigration laws in Title 8 of the United States code; unless 11 such person has been convicted of a violent felony offense as defined in 12 section 70.02 of the penal law or convicted within the past five years 13 of any of the following misdemeanors: 1. assault in the third degree as 14 defined in section 120.00 of the penal law; 2. reckless endangerment in 15 the second degree as defined in section 120.20 of the penal law; 3. 16 sexual misconduct as defined in section 130.20 of the penal law; 4. 17 forcible touching as defined in section 130.52 of the penal law; 5. 18 sexual abuse in the second degree as defined in section 130.60 of the 19 penal law; 6. killing or injuring a police animal as defined in section 20 195.06 of the penal law; 7. harming an animal trained to aid a person 21 with a disability in the first degree as defined in section 195.12 of 22 the penal law; 8. unlawful imprisonment in the second degree as defined 23 in section 135.05 of the penal law; 9. endangering the welfare of a EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02331-01-5 S. 1359 2 1 child as defined in section 260.10 of the penal law; or 10. endangering 2 the welfare of an incompetent or physically disabled person in the 3 second degree as defined in section 260.24 of the penal law. 4 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.